California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(l) (1) Solicited or induced the sale, lease, or listing for sale or lease of residential property on the grounds, wholly or in part, of loss of value, increase in crime, or decline of the quality of the schools due to the present or prospective entry into the neighborhood of a person or persons having a characteristic listed in subdivision (a) or (d) of Section 12955 of the Government Code, as those characteristics are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of, subdivision
 (m) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 12955 of, and Section 12955.2 of, the Government Code.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), with respect to familial status, paragraph (1) shall not be construed to apply to housing for older persons, as defined in Section 12955.9 of the Government Code. With respect to familial status, nothing in paragraph (1) shall be construed to affect Sections 51.2, 51.3, 51.4, 51.10, 51.11, and 799.5 of the Civil Code, relating to housing for senior citizens. Subdivision (d) of Section 51 and Section 4760 of the Civil Code and subdivisions (n), (o), and (p) of Section 12955 of the Government Code shall apply to paragraph (1).

(m) Violated the Franchise Investment Law (Division 5 (commencing with Section 31000) of Title 4 of the Corporations Code)
 or regulations of the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation pertaining thereto.

(n) Violated the Corporate Securities Law of 1968 (Division 1 (commencing with Section 25000) of Title 4 of the Corporations Code) or the regulations of the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation pertaining thereto.

(o) Failed to disclose to the buyer of real property, in a transaction in which the licensee is an agent for the buyer, the nature and extent of a licensee’s direct or indirect ownership interest in that real property. The direct or indirect ownership interest in the property
 by a person related to the licensee by blood or marriage, by an entity in which the licensee has an ownership interest, or by any other person with whom the licensee has a special relationship shall be disclosed to the buyer.

(p) Violated Article 6 (commencing with Section 10237).

(q) Violated or failed to comply with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 2920) of Title 14 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, relating to mortgages.

If a real estate broker that is a corporation has not done any of the foregoing acts, either directly or through its employees, agents, officers, directors, or persons owning or controlling 10 percent or more of the corporation’s stock, the commissioner may not deny the issuance or delay the renewal of a real
 estate license to, or suspend or revoke the real estate license of, the corporation, provided that any offending officer, director, or stockholder, who has done any of the foregoing acts individually and not on behalf
 of the corporation, has been completely disassociated from any affiliation or ownership in the corporation. A decision by the commissioner to delay the renewal of a real estate license shall toll the expiration of that license until the results of any pending disciplinary actions against that licensee are final, or until the licensee voluntarily surrenders the licensee’s license, whichever is earlier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 19.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10177.1.

The commissioner may, without a hearing, suspend the license of any person who procured the issuance of the license to himself by fraud, misrepresentation, deceit, or by the making of any material misstatement of fact in his application for such license.

The power of the commissioner under this section to order a suspension of a license shall expire 90 days after the date of issuance of said license and the suspension itself shall remain in effect only until the effective date of a decision of the commissioner after a hearing conducted pursuant to Section 10100 and the provisions of this section.

A statement of issues as defined in Section 11504 of the Government Code shall be filed and served upon the respondent with the order of suspension. Service by certified or registered mail directed to the respondent’s current address of record on file with the commissioner shall be effective service.

The respondent shall have 30 days after service of the order of suspension and statement of issues in which to file with the commissioner a written request for hearing on the statement of issues filed against him. The commissioner shall hold a hearing within 30 days after receipt of the request therefor unless the respondent shall request or agree to a continuance thereof. If a hearing is not commenced within 30 days after receipt of the request for hearing or on the date to which continued with the agreement of respondent, or if the decision of the commissioner is not rendered within 30 days after completion of the hearing, the order of suspension shall be vacated and set aside.

A hearing conducted under this section shall in all respects, except as otherwise expressly provided herein, conform to the substantive and procedural provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code applicable to a hearing on a statement of issues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 214.)
-------------------------------------------

10177.2.

The commissioner may, upon his or her own motion, and shall, upon the verified complaint in writing of any person, investigate the actions of any licensee, and he or she may suspend or revoke a real estate license at any time where the licensee in performing or attempting to perform any of the acts within the scope of Section 10131.6 has been guilty of any of the following acts:

(a) Has used a false or fictitious name, knowingly made any false statement, or knowingly concealed any material fact, in any application for the registration of a mobilehome, or otherwise committed a fraud in that application.

(b) Failed to provide for the delivery of a properly endorsed certificate of ownership or certificate of title of a mobilehome from the seller to the buyer thereof.

(c) Has knowingly participated in the purchase, sale, or other acquisition or disposal of a stolen mobilehome.

(d) Has submitted a check, draft, or money order to the Department of Housing and Community Development for any obligation or fee due the state and it is thereafter dishonored or refused payment upon presentation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 812, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10177.3.

(a) No licensee shall knowingly or intentionally misrepresent the value of real property.

(b) No licensee that offers or provides an opinion of value of residential real property that is used as the basis for the origination of a mortgage loan shall have a prohibited interest in that property, within the meaning of Section 226.42(d) of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations and the accompanying commentary contained in Volume 75 of the Federal Register, page 66554, dated October 28, 2010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 716, Sec. 2.   (SB 6)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10177.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner may, after hearing in accordance with this part relating to hearings, suspend or revoke the license of a real estate licensee who claims, demands, or receives a commission, fee, or other consideration, as compensation or inducement, for referral of customers to any escrow agent, structural pest control firm, home protection company, title insurer, controlled escrow company, or underwritten title company. A licensee may not be disciplined under any provision of this part for reporting to the commissioner violations of this section by another licensee, unless the licensee making the report had guilty knowledge of, or committed or participated in, the violation of this section.

(b) The term “other consideration” as used in this section does not include any of the following:

(1) Bona fide payments for goods or facilities actually furnished by a licensee or for services actually performed by a licensee, provided these payments are reasonably related to the value of the goods, facilities, or services furnished.

(2) Furnishing of documents, services, information, advertising, educational materials, or items of a like nature that are customary in the real estate business and that relate to the product or services of the furnisher and that are available on a similar and essentially equal basis to all customers or the agents of the customers of the furnisher.

(3) Moderate expenses for food, meals, beverages, and similar items furnished to individual licensees or groups or associations of licensees within a context of customary business, educational, or promotional practices pertaining to the business of the furnisher.

(4) Items of a character and magnitude similar to those in paragraphs (2) and (3) that are promotional of the furnisher’s business customary in the real estate business, and available on a similar and essentially equal basis to all customers, or the agents of the customers, of the furnisher.

(c) Nothing in this section shall relieve any licensee of the obligation of disclosure otherwise required by this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 718, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

10177.5.

When a final judgment is obtained in a civil action against any real estate licensee upon grounds of fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit with reference to any transaction for which a license is required under this division, the commissioner may, after hearing in accordance with the provisions of this part relating to hearings, suspend or revoke the license of such real estate licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 762.)
-------------------------------------------

10177.6.

When an agent undertakes to arrange financing in connection with a sale, lease, or exchange of real property, or when a person or entity arranging financing in connection with the sale, lease, or exchange of real property undertakes to act as an agent with respect to that property, that agent, person, or entity shall, within 24 hours, make a written disclosure of those roles to all parties to the sale, lease, or exchange, and any related loan transaction. For purposes of this section, “agent” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 2079.13 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 286, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10178.

When any real estate salesperson is discharged by his or her responsible broker for a violation of any of the provisions of this article prescribing a ground for disciplinary action, a certified written statement of the facts with reference thereto shall be filed forthwith with the commissioner by the responsible broker, and if the responsible broker fails to notify the commissioner as required by this section, the commissioner may temporarily suspend or permanently revoke the real estate license of the responsible broker, in accordance with the provisions of this part relating to hearings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 46.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10179.

No violation of any of the provisions of this part relating to real estate or of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11000) of Part 2 of this division by any real estate salesperson or employee of any licensed real estate broker shall cause the revocation or suspension of the license of the responsible broker retaining the salesperson or the broker employing the employee unless it appears upon a hearing by the commissioner that the responsible broker or broker had guilty knowledge of the violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 47.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10180.

The commissioner may deny, suspend or revoke the real estate license of a corporation as to any officer or agent acting under its license without revoking the license of the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

10182.

As a condition to the reinstatement of a revoked or suspended license, the commissioner may require the applicant to take and pass a qualifying examination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1243.)
-------------------------------------------

10185.

Any person, including officers, directors, agents or employees of corporations, who willfully violates or knowingly participates in the violation of this division shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 587, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10186.

(a) Following an administrative proceeding, or in connection with a stipulation, when the commissioner grants the right to a license applicant or a licensee to apply for or to obtain a restricted license or restricted mortgage loan originator license endorsement, the commissioner may, in addition to any other terms and conditions placed upon the restricted licensee, require the restricted licensee to pay the monetary costs associated with monitoring the licensed activities conducted by and pursuant to the restricted license or restricted mortgage loan originator license endorsement.

(b) The commissioner may also require, as a condition precedent to the issuance of a restricted license or restricted
 mortgage loan originator license endorsement, that the licensee pay monetary restitution to any person who sustained damages by reason of the act or acts that led to the discipline imposed by the commissioner.

(c) The commissioner shall not renew a license or a mortgage loan originator license endorsement, and may deny an application for the removal of license restrictions or for the reinstatement of an unrestricted license, if the licensee fails to pay all of the costs he or she is ordered to pay pursuant to this section.

(d) The commissioner shall not reinstate an unrestricted license or unrestricted mortgage loan originator license endorsement, or remove restrictions from a license or license endorsement, if the petitioner has failed to pay any costs he or she was ordered to pay pursuant to this section.

(e) The
 commissioner may require a holder of a restricted or revoked license, who petitions the commissioner for reinstatement of his or her license pursuant to Section 11522 of the Government Code, to pay the reasonable costs of processing the petition request.

(f) All costs recovered under this section shall be considered a reimbursement for costs incurred and shall be deposited in the Real Estate Fund to be available, notwithstanding Section 10451, upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 712, Sec. 10.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10186.1.

(a) A license or an endorsement of the department shall be suspended automatically during any time that the licensee is incarcerated after conviction of a felony, regardless of whether the conviction has been appealed. The department shall, immediately upon receipt of the certified copy of the record of conviction, determine whether the license or endorsement has been automatically suspended by virtue of the licensee’s incarceration, and if so, the duration of that suspension. The department shall notify the licensee of the suspension and of the right to elect to have the issue of penalty heard as provided in subdivision (d).

(b) If after a hearing before an administrative law judge from the Office of Administrative Hearings it is determined that the felony for
 which the licensee was convicted was substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensee, the commissioner upon receipt of the certified copy of the record of conviction, shall suspend the license or endorsement until the time for appeal has elapsed, if an appeal has not been taken, or until the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or has otherwise become final, and until further order of the department.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a conviction of a charge of violating any federal statute or regulation or any statute or regulation of this state regulating dangerous drugs or controlled substances, or a conviction of Section 187, 261, 288, or former Section 262, of the Penal Code, shall be conclusively presumed to be substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensee and a hearing shall not be held on this issue. However, upon its own motion or for good cause shown,
 the commissioner may decline to impose or may set aside the suspension when it appears to be in the interest of justice to do so, with due regard to maintaining the integrity of, and confidence in, the practice regulated by the department.

(d) (1) Discipline may be ordered against a licensee in accordance with the laws and regulations of the department when the time for appeal has elapsed, the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing the person to withdraw a plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, complaint, information, or indictment.

(2) The issue of penalty shall be heard by an administrative law judge from the
 Office of Administrative Hearings. The hearing shall not be held until the judgment of conviction has become final or, irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code, an order granting probation has been made suspending the imposition of sentence, except that a licensee may, at the licensee’s option, elect to have the issue of penalty decided before those time periods have elapsed. Where the licensee so elects, the issue of penalty shall be heard in the manner described in subdivision (b) at the hearing to determine whether the conviction was substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensee. If the conviction of a licensee who has made this election is overturned on appeal, any discipline ordered pursuant to this section shall automatically cease. This subdivision does not prohibit the department from pursuing disciplinary action based on any cause other than the overturned conviction.

(e) The record of the proceedings resulting in a conviction, including a transcript of the testimony in those proceedings, may be received in evidence.

(f) Any other law setting forth a procedure for the suspension or revocation of a license or endorsement issued by the department shall not apply to proceedings conducted pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 3.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10186.2.

(a) (1) A licensee shall report any of the following to the department:

(A) The bringing of a criminal complaint, information, or indictment charging a felony against the licensee.

(B) The conviction of the licensee, including any verdict of guilty, or plea of guilty or no contest, of any felony or misdemeanor.

(C) Any disciplinary action taken by another licensing entity or authority of this state or of another state or an agency of the federal government.

(2) The report required by this subdivision shall be made in writing within 30 days of the date
 of the bringing of the indictment or the charging of a felony, the conviction, or the disciplinary action.

(b) Failure to make a report required by this section shall constitute a cause for discipline.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 48.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10186.9.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on and after January 1, 2015, the department shall be subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 712, Sec. 13.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Fees [10200. - 10227.]

10200.

All real estate license fees shall be payable in advance of issuing the licenses and at the time of filing the application.

Unless otherwise provided, all licenses expire at midnight of the last day of the period for which issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1956, Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10201.

The holder of a license who fails to renew it prior to the expiration of the period for which it was issued and who has otherwise qualified for such license, may renew it within two years from such expiration upon proper application and the payment of a late renewal fee in an amount equal to one and one-half times the regular renewal fee in effect at the time the license is reinstated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 416, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10201.6.

Any person who has qualified in an examination for a real estate license shall file the required application and fee for the license within one year thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1489.)
-------------------------------------------

10202.

The definitions contained in this article are solely for the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 127.)
-------------------------------------------

10207.

The amount of the real estate fees prescribed for an examination or for a license under this chapter is that fixed by the following provisions of this article. No part of any fee paid in accordance with the provisions of this chapter is refundable. It is deemed earned by the department upon its receipt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 622.)
-------------------------------------------

10208.5.

The real estate broker license examination fee is one hundred fifty dollars ($150), not to exceed one hundred ninety-five dollars ($195). The real estate broker license reexamination fee is one hundred fifty dollars ($150), not to exceed one hundred ninety-five dollars ($195).

If an applicant fails to appear for the examination within two years from the date of filing their application and fee for the examination, their application shall thereupon lapse and no further proceedings thereon shall be taken.

This section shall remain in effect unless it is superseded pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 10226.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 41, Sec. 5.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Note: Fees are subject to reduction as prescribed in Section 10226.5.)
-------------------------------------------

10209.

(a) The commissioner shall, by regulation, establish fees for applications for approval of equivalent courses of study as defined in Section 10153.5 in an amount sufficient to cover the cost of administration. The fee for an application for approval of each course given by a private vocational school, including any branch school that gives the same course, shall be five hundred dollars ($500), not to exceed six hundred fifty dollars ($650).

(b) The commissioner shall notify every applicant of their decision on the application no later than 60 days after receipt by the commissioner of a completed application. The application shall be on a form to be supplied by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 41, Sec. 6.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10209.2.

The commissioner shall, by regulation, establish fees for applications for approval of educational courses, seminars, workshops, conference, or their equivalent, or for the evaluation of petition based on a claim of equivalency, as authorized by Section 10170.4 in an amount sufficient to cover the cost of processing such applications or petitions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 66, Sec. 10.5.)
-------------------------------------------

10209.5.

The fee for a restricted broker license shall be the same as that for an unrestricted license as provided in Section 10210.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 416, Sec. 6) by Stats. 1996, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Note: Fee is subject to reduction as prescribed in Sections 10226 and 10226.5.)
-------------------------------------------

10210.

(a) The fee for a real estate broker license shall be four hundred fifty dollars ($450), not to exceed five hundred eighty-five dollars ($585).

In the case of an original applicant, the fee is payable upon filing the real estate broker license application.

(b) If an applicant fails to pass the real estate broker license examination within two years from the date of filing their broker license application, their broker license application shall lapse and no further proceedings thereon shall be taken.

(c) This section shall remain in effect unless it is superseded pursuant to Section 10226 or subdivision (a) of Section
 10226.5, whichever is applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 41, Sec. 7.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Note: Fee is subject to reduction as prescribed in Sections 10226 and 10226.5.)
-------------------------------------------

10211.

If the licensee is a corporation, the license issued to it entitles one officer thereof, on behalf of the corporation, to engage in the business of real estate broker without the payment of any further fee, such officer to be designated in the application of the corporation for a license. For each officer other than the officer so designated, through whom it engages in the business of real estate broker, the appropriate original or renewal fee is to be paid in addition to the fee paid by the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1956, Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10213.5.

The real estate salesperson license examination fee shall be one hundred dollars ($100), not to exceed one hundred thirty dollars ($130). The real estate salesperson license reexamination fee shall be one hundred dollars ($100), not to exceed one hundred thirty dollars ($130).

If an applicant fails to appear for the examination within two years from the date of filing their application and fee for the examination, their application shall thereupon lapse and no further proceedings thereon shall be taken.

This section shall remain in effect unless it is superseded pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 10226.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 41, Sec. 8.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Note: Fees are subject to reduction as prescribed in Section 10226.5.)
-------------------------------------------

10213.6.

If an applicant for any examination fails to take the examination on the date scheduled, they may make application in writing to the principal office of the department in Sacramento for a new date. A fee of forty-five dollars ($45), not to exceed fifty-nine dollars ($59), shall accompany the written request for applying for the first new examination date in the case of a broker applicant, and a fee of forty dollars ($40), not to exceed fifty-two dollars ($52), shall accompany the written request for the first new examination date in the case of a salesperson applicant. A fee of forty-five dollars ($45), not to exceed fifty-nine dollars ($59), shall accompany the written request for all subsequent new examination dates in the case of broker applicants. A fee of forty dollars ($40), not to exceed fifty-two
 dollars ($52), shall accompany the written request for all subsequent new examination dates for salesperson applicants.

This section shall remain in effect unless it is superseded pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 10226.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 41, Sec. 9.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Note: Fees are subject to reduction as prescribed in Section 10226.5.)
-------------------------------------------

10214.5.

The fee for a restricted salesperson license shall be the same as that for an unrestricted license as provided in Section 10215.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 416, Sec. 10) by Stats. 1996, Ch. 657, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Note: Fee is subject to reduction as prescribed in Sections 10226 and 10226.5.)
-------------------------------------------

10215.

(a) The fee for a real estate salesperson license shall be three hundred fifty dollars ($350), not to exceed four hundred fifty-five dollars ($455).

In the case of an original applicant, the fee is payable upon filing the real estate salesperson license application.

(b) If an applicant fails to pass the real estate salesperson license examination within two years from the date of filing their salesperson license application, their salesperson license application shall lapse and no further proceedings thereon shall be taken.

(c) This section shall remain in effect unless it is superseded pursuant to Section 10226 or
 subdivision (a) of Section 10226.5, whichever is applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 41, Sec. 10.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Note: Fee is subject to reduction as prescribed in Sections 10226 and 10226.5.)
-------------------------------------------

10222.

For any examination required under any order issued pursuant to the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, the fee shall be the same as for a salesperson or broker license examination, as appropriate.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 342, Sec. 15) by Stats. 1997, Ch. 232, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

10225.

An application for a permit to sell real property securities secured by liens on real property situated outside the State of California shall be accompanied by the filing fee together with an amount equivalent to twenty-five cents ($0.25) a mile for each mile going and returning, or where public transportation is available the actual round trip fare pertaining thereto, estimated by the commissioner to be traveled from the office of the Department of Real Estate where the application is filed to the location of the property, and the amount estimated to be necessary to cover the expense of the inspection and appraisal of the property, not to exceed seventy-five dollars ($75) a day for each day actually spent in the inspection and appraisal of the property or properties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1355, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10226.

(a) The commissioner may periodically by regulation prescribe fees lower than the maximum fees provided in Sections 10209.5, 10210, 10214.5, 10215, and 10250.3 whenever they determine those lower fees are sufficient to offset the costs and expenses incurred in the administration of Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of this division. The commissioner shall hold at least one regulation hearing each calendar year, to determine if lower fees should be prescribed. At this hearing, the department shall report on the financial status of the department, including the revenues, expenditures, and reserves as of the end of the previous fiscal year. The department shall post a hearing notice 15 days in advance of the hearing that includes the required information about the financial status of the
 department.

(b) If, as of June 30 of any fiscal year, the balance of funds in the Real Estate Fund exceeds an amount equal to 150 percent of the department’s authorized budget for the following year, then within 30 days thereafter the commissioner shall, notwithstanding the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), issue regulations reducing real estate license and subdivision fees so that as of June 30 of the next fiscal year the balance of funds in the Real Estate Fund shall not exceed an amount equal to 150 percent of the department’s authorized budget for that year.

(c) If the commissioner fails to reduce these fees within the timeframe specified in subdivision (b), then fees shall automatically be reduced to the levels as indicated in subdivision (b) of Section 10226.5. That reduction
 shall be effective no later than September 1 of the fiscal year wherein the commissioner is obliged to issue regulations pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 41, Sec. 11.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10226.5.

(a) If at any time funds are transferred or loaned from the Real Estate Fund to the General Fund by the Budget Act, then 30 days from and after the date of the transfer or loan, fees shall be reduced as indicated in subdivision (b), irrespective of any provisions of the Budget Act precluding that reduction.

(b) Fees shall be reduced pursuant to paragraph (a) to the following maximum amounts:

(1) Real estate broker examination or reexamination: Fifty dollars ($50).

(2) First reschedule of broker examination: Fifteen dollars ($15); subsequent reschedules: Twenty-five dollars ($25).

(3) Real estate broker license, original or renewal: One hundred sixty-five dollars ($165).

(4) Real estate salesperson examination or reexamination: Twenty-five dollars ($25).

(5) First reschedule of salesperson examination: Ten dollars ($10); subsequent reschedules: Twenty-five dollars ($25).

(6) Real estate salesperson license, original or renewal: One hundred twenty dollars ($120).

(7) Real estate salesperson license without all educational requirements: One hundred forty-five dollars ($145).

(8) A notice of intention without a completed questionnaire: One hundred fifty dollars ($150).

(9) An original public report for subdivision interests described in Section 11004.5: One thousand six hundred dollars ($1,600) plus ten dollars ($10) for each subdivision interest to be offered.

(10) An original public report for subdivision interests other than those described in Section 11004.5: Five hundred dollars ($500) plus ten dollars ($10) for each interest to be offered.

(11) A conditional public report for subdivision interests described in Section 11004.5: Five hundred dollars ($500).

(12) A conditional public report for subdivision interests other than those described in Section 11004.5: Five hundred dollars ($500).

(13) A preliminary public report for subdivision interests described in Section 11004.5: Five hundred dollars ($500).

(14) A preliminary public report for subdivision interests other than those described in Section 11004.5: Five hundred dollars ($500).

(15) A renewal public report for subdivision interests described in Section 11004.5: Five hundred dollars ($500).

(16) A renewal public report for subdivision interests other than those described in Section 11004.5: Five hundred dollars ($500).

(17) An amended public report for subdivision interests described in Section 11004.5: Three hundred dollars ($300) plus ten dollars ($10) for each subdivision interest to be offered under the amended public report for which a fee has not previously been paid.

(18) An amended public report to offer subdivision interests other than those described in Section 11004.5: Three hundred dollars ($300) plus ten dollars ($10) for each subdivision interest to be offered under the amended public report for which a fee has not previously been paid.

(19) An application for an original, renewal, or amended registration as required by Section 10249: One hundred dollars ($100).

(20) The filing fee for an application for a permit to be issued pursuant to Article 8.5 (commencing with Section 10250) for each subdivision or phase of the subdivision in which interests are to be offered for sale or lease shall be as follows:

(A) One thousand six hundred dollars ($1,600) plus ten dollars ($10) for each subdivision interest to be offered for an original permit application.

(B) Five hundred dollars ($500) plus ten dollars ($10) for each subdivision interest to be offered that was not permitted to be offered under the permit to be renewed for a renewal permit application.

(C) Three hundred dollars ($300) plus ten dollars ($10) for each subdivision interest to be offered under the amended permit for which a fee has not previously been paid for an amended permit application.

(D) Five hundred dollars ($500) for a conditional permit application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 676, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

10227.

(a) Beginning January 1, 2025, before submitting a regulatory fee increase proposal to the Office of Administrative Law for initial publication, the department shall conduct at least one meeting to which statewide membership organizations that represent any of the following are invited to attend:

(1) One hundred fifty thousand or more persons or entities licensed by the department under the Real Estate Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4).

(2) Less than 150,000 persons or entities licensed by the department under the Real Estate Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4).

(3) Persons or entities that pay fees to the department pursuant to the Subdivided Lands Law (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11000) of Part 2 of Division 4) and the Vacation Ownership and Time-share Act of 2004 (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11210) of Part 2 of Division 4).

(b) The department shall provide the statewide membership organizations identified in subdivision (a) information related to the proposed fee increase 30 days in advance of any meeting scheduled pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) The department may, at its discretion, promulgate regulations to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 41, Sec. 12.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Transactions in Trust Deeds and Real Property Sales Contracts [10230. - 10236.7.]

10230.

(a) The provisions of this article do not apply to the negotiation of a loan by or on behalf of a real estate broker in connection with a qualifying sale or exchange of real property in which the broker acted as the agent of one or more of the parties to the sale or exchange, nor to the sale or exchange by or on behalf of the broker of a promissory note created for the purpose of financing a qualifying real property sale or exchange transaction in which the broker acted as the agent of one or more of the parties to the qualifying real property sale or exchange regardless of the time of the sale or exchange of the promissory note. For the purposes of this subdivision, a “qualifying” sale or exchange of real property is one that is subject to the requirements of Article 3 (commencing with Section 2956) of Chapter 2 of Title 14 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to the negotiation of loans nor to sales or exchanges of promissory notes in connection with the financing of a real property sale or exchange transaction in which the broker had a direct or indirect monetary interest as a party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 641, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

10231.
